District of Columbia statutes.
7-1671.12

Public and private insurance.

Nothing in this chapter shall require a governmental, private, or any other health insurance provider or health care service plan to be liable for any claim for reimbursement for the use of medical marijuana.

History

Feb. 25, 2010, D.C. Law 13-315, § 13
as added July 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-210, § 2, 57 DCR 4798